Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.395

State funding—Benefits covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

State funding shall be provided to each educational service district for the employer cost of school employees' benefits that are provided to employees of an educational service district that are covered by a collective bargaining agreement.

[ 2022 c 87 s 1.]